Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 11. Miscellaneous Provisions

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-1101.
Records available to the public; restrictions.

Any records, reports or information obtained under this act or the rules, regulations and standards promulgated hereunder are available to the public. Upon a showing satisfactory to the director by any person that his records, reports or information or particular parts thereof, other than emission and pollution data, to which the director and administrators have access under this act if made public would divulge trade secrets, the director and administrators shall consider the records, reports or information or particular portions thereof confidential in the administration of this act.

Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent disclosure of any records, reports or information to federal, state or local agencies necessary for the purposes of administration of any federal, state or local air, water or land control measures or regulations or when relevant to any proceedings under this act.

In any suit under this section or the Public Records Act, W.S.

16-4-201

et seq., to compel the release of information under this act, the court may assess against the state reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in any case in which the complainant has substantially prevailed and in which the court determines the award is appropriate.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.53; Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1994, ch. 82, § 2; 1995, ch. 58, § 2; 1998, ch. 80, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing public records generally, see §§

9-2-405

to

9-2-413

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1995, ch. 58, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 1995.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xii).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Environmental Audits in Wyoming: A Practitioner's Guide,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 655 (1997).

§ 35-11-1102.
Hearing unnecessary prior to issuance of emergency order.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a hearing prior to the issuance of an emergency order.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.54.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-1103.
Property exempt from ad valorem taxation.

The following property is exempt from ad valorem taxation pursuant to the provisions of this act and includes facilities, installations, machinery or equipment attached or unattached to real property and designed, installed and utilized primarily for the elimination, control or prevention of air, water or land pollution, or in the event such facility, installation, equipment or machinery shall also serve other beneficial purposes and use, such portion of the assessed valuation thereof as may be reasonably calculated to be necessary for and devoted to elimination, control or prevention of air, water and land pollution. The department of revenue shall determine the exempt portion on all property assessed pursuant to W.S. 39-13-102(m). The county assessor shall determine the exempt portion on all property assessed pursuant to W.S. 39-13-103(b). The determination shall not include as exempt any portion of any facilities which have value as the specific source of marketable byproducts.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.55; Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; ch. 249, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Property exempt not limited to that required. —

By including the language “pursuant to the provisions of this act,” the legislature expressly defined the property which was subject to the ad valorem tax exemption articulated in this section as being property having to do with environmental quality and distinguished that property from other types of property, which were exempt from ad valorem taxation; the legislature did not limit the exemption to property required by the Department of Environmental Quality or federal environmental protection agencies. 872 P.2d 1163,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 47

.

Monitoring devices. —

Under the plain and ordinary meaning of the statutory language, monitoring devices fit squarely within the ad valorem tax exemption. 872 P.2d 1163,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 47

.

Pollution control equipment exempt during construction for considerable period of time. —

Since the department of revenue and taxation exempted pollution control equipment during construction for a considerable period of time without the legislature's making any statutory changes, court inferred that this interpretation was consistent with legislative intent. State Bd. of Equalization v. Tenneco Oil Co., 694 P.2d 97,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 431

(Wyo. 1985).

Equipment necessary to produce marketable product. —

Although this section exempts pollution control devices from taxation, there is no evidence of an intent by the legislature to exempt equipment which is necessary to produce a marketable final product, even if that final product pollutes less when consumed by an end-user and even if environmental regulations require the modification to the final product. Laramie County Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 915 P.2d 1184,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1996).

Department need not consider county assessor's recommendation. —

In determining the tax exemption of pollution control equipment, the state board of equalization (now the department of revenue) need not consider the recommendation of the county assessor. General Chem. Corp. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 418,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1991).

And need not consider equipment's operating costs. —

The state board of equalization (now the department of revenue) correctly interprets this section by not considering operating costs in determining the amount of value of pollution control equipment for ad valorem taxation. General Chem. Corp. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 418,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1991).

State Board exceeded its authority. —

The State Board of Equalization exceeded its statutory authority by adopting a rule which allowed the ad valorem tax exemption for only property which was required by the state or federal environmental protection agencies and by adopting a rule which did not allow the exemption for monitoring devices. 872 P.2d 1163,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 47

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “‘Primary Purpose’ Pollution Control Tax Incentives: Is The Public Getting What It's Paying For?,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1996).

§ 35-11-1104.
Limitation of scope of provisions.

Nothing in this act:

Grants to the department or any division thereof any jurisdiction or authority with respect to pollution existing solely within commercial and industrial plants, works or shops;

Affects the relations between employers and employees with respect to or arising out of any condition of pollution;

Limits or interferes with the jurisdiction, duties or authority of the state engineer, the state board of control, the director of the Wyoming game and fish department, the state mine inspector, the oil and gas supervisor or the oil and gas conservation commission, or the occupational health and safety commission.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.56; Laws 1974, ch. 14, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 198, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii) substituted “director of the Wyoming game and fish department” for “game and fish commissioner.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 3, repealed Laws 1999, ch. 204, § 1, which had amended this section effective July 1, 2001 by substituting “commission” for “commissioner” following “game and fish“ in (a)(iii), and adding (b) through (e).

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Severability. —

Section 4, ch. 250, Laws 1973, provides: “If any provision of this act or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this act and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Town of Torrington v. Envtl. Quality Council, 557 P.2d 1143,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 35-11-1105.
Environmental audit privilege; exceptions; burden of proof; waiver; disclosure after in camera review; application.

As used in this section:

“Environmental audit” means a voluntary, internal and comprehensive evaluation of one (1) or more facilities or an activity at one (1) or more facilities regulated under this act, or of management systems related to the facility or activity, that is designed to identify and prevent noncompliance and to improve compliance with this act. An environmental audit may be conducted by the owner or operator, by the owner’s or operator’s employees or by independent contractors. Once initiated the voluntary environmental audit shall be completed within one hundred eighty (180) days. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize uninterrupted voluntary environmental audits;

“Environmental audit report” means a set of documents, each labeled “Environmental Audit Report: Privileged Document,” prepared as a result of an environmental audit and may include field notes and records of observations, findings, opinions, suggestions, conclusions, drafts, memoranda, drawings, photographs, computer-generated or electronically recorded information, maps, charts, graphs and surveys if supporting information is generated or developed for the primary purpose and in the course of an environmental audit. An environmental audit report, when completed, shall have three (3) components:

An audit report prepared by the auditor, including the scope, commencement and completion dates of the audit, the information gained in the audit, conclusions and recommendations, together with exhibits and appendices;

Memoranda and documents analyzing the audit report and discussing implementation issues; and

An audit implementation plan that corrects past noncompliance, improves current compliance and prevents future noncompliance.

“In camera review” means a hearing or review in a courtroom, hearing room or chambers to which the general public is not admitted. However, all parties to a civil or administrative proceeding may attend an in camera hearing and shall have a reasonable opportunity to review the documents for which the privilege is claimed and challenge the application of privilege to an environmental audit report. After such hearing or review, the content of oral and other evidence and statements of the judge, counsel and all parties shall be held in confidence by those participating in or present at the hearing or review, and any transcript of the hearing or review shall be sealed and not considered a public record until its contents are disclosed, pursuant to this section, by a court having jurisdiction over the matter.

Owners and operators of facilities and persons whose activities are regulated under this act may conduct a voluntary internal environmental audit of compliance programs and management systems to assess and improve compliance with this act. An environmental audit privilege is created to protect the confidentiality of communications relating to these audits.

An environmental audit report is privileged and shall not be admissible as evidence in any civil or administrative proceeding, except as follows:

The owner or operator of a facility may waive this privilege in whole or in part. If an owner or operator of a facility or person conducting an activity seeks to introduce any part of an environmental audit report as evidence in any proceeding, including reporting of violations under W.S. 35-11-1106(a), the privilege is waived as to those sections of the report dealing with that media sought to be introduced into evidence;

In a civil or administrative proceeding, the court or hearing officer after in camera review consistent with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, shall require disclosure of all or part of the report if it determines:

The privilege is asserted for a fraudulent purpose;

The material is not subject to the privilege;

The material shows evidence of noncompliance with this act or any federal environmental law or regulation and appropriate efforts to achieve compliance were not pursued as promptly as circumstances permit and completed with reasonable diligence; or

The information contained in the environmental audit report demonstrates a substantial threat to the public health or environment or damage to real property or tangible personal property in areas outside of the facility property.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 80, § 2.

A party asserting the privilege granted under this section has the burden of proving the privilege, including proof that appropriate efforts to achieve compliance with this act or any federal environmental law or regulation were promptly pursued and completed with reasonable diligence. A party seeking disclosure under subparagraph (c)(ii)(A) of this section has the burden of proving that the privilege is asserted for a fraudulent purpose;

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 80, § 2.

The parties may at any time stipulate to entry of an order directing whether specific information contained in an environmental audit report is subject to the privilege provided under this section;

Upon making a determination under paragraph (c)(ii) of this section, the court shall compel disclosure of those portions of an environmental audit report relevant to issues in dispute in the proceeding.

The privilege described in this section shall not extend to:

Documents, communications, data, reports or other information required to be collected, developed, maintained, reported or otherwise made available to a regulatory agency or to any person pursuant to any regulatory requirement of this act or any other federal or state law or regulation;

Information obtained by observation, sampling or monitoring by any regulatory agency;

Information obtained from a source independent of the environmental audit;

Documents existing prior to the commencement of the environmental audit; or

Documents prepared subsequent to and independent of the completion of the environmental audit.

Nothing in this section shall limit, waive or abrogate the scope or nature of any statutory or common law privilege, including the work product doctrine and the attorney-client privilege.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 58, § 1; 1998, ch. 80, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (d)(iii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1995, ch. 58, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 1995.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Environmental Audits in Wyoming: A Practitioner's Guide,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 655 (1997).

§ 35-11-1106.
Limitation on civil penalties; voluntary reports of violations.

If an owner or operator of a facility regulated under this act voluntarily reports to the department a violation disclosed by the audit conducted under W.S.

35-11-1105

within sixty (60) days of the completion date of the audit, the department shall not seek civil penalties or injunctive relief for the violation reported unless:

The facility is under investigation for any violation of this act at the time the violation is reported;

The owner or operator does not take action to eliminate the violation within the time frame specified in an order affirmed by the council or otherwise made final pursuant to W.S. 35-11-701(c)(ii);

The violation is the result of gross negligence or recklessness; or

The department has assumed primacy over a federally delegated environmental law and a waiver of penalty authority would result in a state program less stringent than the federal program or the waiver would violate any federal rule or regulation required to maintain state primacy. If a federally delegated program requires the imposition of a penalty for a violation, the voluntary disclosure of the violation shall to the extent allowed under federal law or regulation, be considered a mitigating factor in determining the penalty amount.

Reporting a violation is mandatory if required by this act, any departmental rule or regulation, federal law or regulation, local ordinance or resolution, any order of the council or by any court and is therefore not voluntary under this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, injunctive relief may be sought under W.S.

35-11-115

.

The elimination of administrative or civil penalties under this section does not apply if a person or entity has been found by a court to have committed serious violations that constitute a pattern of continuous or repeated violations of environmental laws, rules, regulations, permit conditions, settlement agreements or orders on consent and that were due to separate and distinct events giving rise to the violations, within the three (3) year period prior to the date of the disclosure. A pattern of continuous or repeated violations may also be demonstrated by multiple settlement agreements related to substantially the same alleged violations concerning serious instances of noncompliance with environmental laws that occurred within the three (3) year period immediately prior to the date of the voluntary disclosure.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 58, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1995, ch. 58, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 1995.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Environmental Audits in Wyoming: A Practitioner's Guide,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 655 (1997).

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 161.